Washington statutes.
RCW 43.34.090

Building names.

(1) The legislature shall approve names for new or existing buildings on the state capitol grounds based upon recommendations from the state capitol committee and the director of the department of enterprise services, with the advice of the capitol campus design advisory committee, subject to the following limitations:

(a) An existing building may be renamed only after a substantial renovation or a change in the predominant tenant agency headquartered in the building.

(b) A new or existing building may be named or renamed after:

(i) An individual who has played a significant role in Washington history;

(ii) The purpose of the building;

(iii) The single or predominant tenant agency headquartered in the building;

(iv) A significant place name or natural place in Washington;

(v) A Native American tribe located in Washington;

(vi) A group of people or type of person;

(vii) Any other appropriate person consistent with this section as recommended by the director of the department of enterprise services.

(c) The names on the facades of the state capitol group shall not be removed.

(2) The legislature shall approve names for new or existing public rooms or spaces on the west capitol campus based upon recommendations from the state capitol committee and the director of the department of enterprise services, with the advice of the capitol campus design advisory committee, subject to the following limitations:

(a) An existing room or space may be renamed only after a substantial renovation;

(b) A new or existing room or space may be named or renamed only after:

(i) An individual who has played a significant role in Washington history;

(ii) The purpose of the room or space;

(iii) A significant place name or natural place in Washington;

(iv) A Native American tribe located in Washington;

(v) A group of people or type of person;

(vi) Any other appropriate person consistent with this section as recommended by the director of the department of enterprise services.

(3) When naming or renaming buildings, rooms, and spaces under this section, consideration must be given to: (a) Any disparity that exists with respect to the gender of persons after whom buildings, rooms, and spaces are named on the state capitol grounds; (b) the diversity of human achievement; and (c) the diversity of the state's citizenry and history.

(4) For purposes of this section, "state capitol grounds" means buildings and land owned by the state and otherwise designated as state capitol grounds, including the west capitol campus, the east capitol campus, the north capitol campus, the Tumwater campus, the Lacey campus, Sylvester Park, Centennial Park, the Old Capitol Building, and Capitol Lake.

[ 2015 c 225 s 74; 2002 c 164 s 1.]

NOTES: